Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3609
Commitment; medical or surgical treatment; consent required.

No person committed under the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act shall be required to submit to medical or surgical treatment without his or her consent or, if incompetent, without the consent of his or her legal guardian, or, if a minor, without the consent of a parent or next of kin.

Laws 1963, c. 399, § 9, p. 1276;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 92.